apertium-is-en.is.dix
    <pardef n="háð/ur__adj">
      <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ri</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ra</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ra</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ra</l>        <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="vei"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ara</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ara</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ara</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ari</l>       <r>ur<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sta"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="háður">           <i>háð</i><par n="háð/ur__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="steyptur">        <i>steypt</i><par n="háð/ur__adj"/></e>
